Nevada, session 83, AB491.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 293 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
Except as otherwise provided in this title, if the Secretary of
State requests any information or data relating to the current
election cycle from a county clerk or city clerk, the county or city
clerk shall, not later than the end of the second working day after
receiving the request, provide the Secretary of State with:
1. The information or data; or
2. A written explanation that indicates when the county or
city clerk will reasonably be able to provide the information or
data.
Sec. 2. NRS 293.1755 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.1755 1. In addition to any other requirement provided by
law, no person may be a candidate for any office unless, for at least
the 30 days immediately preceding the date of the close of filing of
declarations of candidacy for the office which the person seeks, the
person has [, in] :
(a) In accordance with NRS 281.050, actually, as opposed to
constructively, resided in the State, district, county, township or
other area prescribed by law to which the office pertains and, if
elected, over which he or she will have jurisdiction or will represent
[.] ; and
(b) Registered to vote in the State, district, county, township or
other area prescribed by law in which the officer is required to
reside and, if elected, over which he or she will have jurisdiction
or will represent.
2. Any person who knowingly and willfully files a declaration
of candidacy which contains a false statement regarding the person’s
residency in violation of this section is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor.
3. The provisions of this section do not apply to candidates
for [:
(a) Any] any federal office.
[(b)] 4. The provisions of paragraph (a) of subsection 1 do
not apply to candidates for the office of district attorney.
Sec. 3. NRS 293.177 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.177 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.165
and 293.166, a name may not be printed on a ballot to be used at a
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
primary election unless the person named has filed a declaration of
candidacy with the appropriate filing officer and paid the filing fee
required by NRS 293.193 not earlier than:
(a) For a candidate for judicial office, the first Monday in
January of the year in which the election is to be held and not later
than 5 p.m. on the second Friday after the first Monday in January;
and
(b) For all other candidates, the first Monday in March of the
year in which the election is to be held and not later than 5 p.m. on
the second Friday after the first Monday in March.
2. A declaration of candidacy required to be filed pursuant to
this chapter must be in substantially the following form:
(a) For partisan office:
DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY OF ........ FOR THE
OFFICE OF ................
State of Nevada
County of ........................
For the purpose of having my name placed on the official
ballot as a candidate for the ................ Party nomination for
the office of ........., I, the undersigned ........, do swear or
affirm under penalty of perjury that I actually, as opposed to
constructively, reside at .........., in the City or Town of .......,
County of .........., State of Nevada; that my actual, as opposed
to constructive, residence in the State, district, county,
township, city or other area prescribed by law to which the
office pertains began on a date at least 30 days immediately
preceding the date of the close of filing of declarations of
candidacy for this office; that my telephone number is
............, and the address at which I receive mail, if different
than my residence, is .........; that I am registered as a member
of the ................ Party; that I am a qualified elector pursuant
to Section 1 of Article 2 of the Constitution of the State of
Nevada; if I am filing for a public office other than a federal
office, I am registered to vote in the City or Town of .......,
County of .........., State of Nevada; that if I have ever been
convicted of treason or a felony, my civil rights have been
restored; that I have not, in violation of the provisions of NRS
293.176, changed the designation of my political party or
political party affiliation on an official application to register
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
to vote in any state since December 31 before the closing
filing date for this election; that I generally believe in and
intend to support the concepts found in the principles and
policies of that political party in the coming election; that if
nominated as a candidate of the ................ Party at the
ensuing election, I will accept that nomination and not
withdraw; that I will not knowingly violate any election law
or any law defining and prohibiting corrupt and fraudulent
practices in campaigns and elections in this State; that I will
qualify for the office if elected thereto, including, but not
limited to, complying with any limitation prescribed by the
Constitution and laws of this State concerning the number of
years or terms for which a person may hold the office; that I
understand that knowingly and willfully filing a declaration
of candidacy which contains a false statement is a crime
punishable as a gross misdemeanor and also subjects me to a
civil action disqualifying me from entering upon the duties of
the office; and that I understand that my name will appear on
all ballots as designated in this declaration.
................................................................
(Designation of name)
................................................................
(Signature of candidate for office)
Subscribed and sworn to before me
this ...... day of the month of ...... of the year ......
......................................................................
Notary Public or other person
authorized to administer an oath
(b) For nonpartisan office:
DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY OF ........ FOR THE
OFFICE OF ................
State of Nevada
County of ........................
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
For the purpose of having my name placed on the official
ballot as a candidate for the office of ................, I, the
undersigned ................, do swear or affirm under penalty of
perjury that I actually, as opposed to constructively, reside at
........., in the City or Town of ......., County of ........., State of
Nevada; that my actual, as opposed to constructive, residence
in the State, district, county, township, city or other area
prescribed by law to which the office pertains began on a date
at least 30 days immediately preceding the date of the close
of filing of declarations of candidacy for this office; that my
telephone number is ..........., and the address at which I
receive mail, if different than my residence, is ..........; that I
am a qualified elector pursuant to Section 1 of Article 2 of the
Constitution of the State of Nevada; if I am filing for a
public office other than a federal office, I am registered to
vote in the City or Town of ......., County of .........., State of
Nevada; that if I have ever been convicted of treason or a
felony, my civil rights have been restored; that if nominated
as a nonpartisan candidate at the ensuing election, I will
accept the nomination and not withdraw; that I will not
knowingly violate any election law or any law defining and
prohibiting corrupt and fraudulent practices in campaigns and
elections in this State; that I will qualify for the office if
elected thereto, including, but not limited to, complying with
any limitation prescribed by the Constitution and laws of this
State concerning the number of years or terms for which a
person may hold the office; that I understand that knowingly
and willfully filing a declaration of candidacy which contains
a false statement is a crime punishable as a gross
misdemeanor and also subjects me to a civil action
disqualifying me from entering upon the duties of the office;
and that I understand that my name will appear on all ballots
as designated in this declaration.
................................................................
(Designation of name)
................................................................
(Signature of candidate for office)
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
Subscribed and sworn to before me
this ...... day of the month of ...... of the year ......
......................................................................
Notary Public or other person
authorized to administer an oath
3. The address of a candidate which must be included in the
declaration of candidacy pursuant to subsection 2 must be the street
address of the residence where the candidate actually, as opposed to
constructively, resides in accordance with NRS 281.050, if one has
been assigned. The declaration of candidacy must not be accepted
for filing if the candidate fails to comply with the following
provisions of this subsection or, if applicable, the provisions of
subsection 4:
(a) The candidate shall not list the candidate’s address as a post
office box unless a street address has not been assigned to his or her
residence; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the candidate
shall present to the filing officer:
(1) A valid driver’s license or identification card issued by a
governmental agency that contains a photograph of the candidate
and the candidate’s residential address; or
(2) A current utility bill, bank statement, paycheck, or
document issued by a governmental entity, including a check which
indicates the candidate’s name and residential address, but not
including a voter registration card.
4. If the candidate executes an oath or affirmation under
penalty of perjury stating that the candidate is unable to present to
the filing officer the proof of residency required by subsection 3
because a street address has not been assigned to the candidate’s
residence or because the rural or remote location of the candidate’s
residence makes it impracticable to present the proof of residency
required by subsection 3, the candidate shall present to the filing
officer:
(a) A valid driver’s license or identification card issued by a
governmental agency that contains a photograph of the candidate;
and
(b) Alternative proof of the candidate’s residential address that
the filing officer determines is sufficient to verify where the
candidate actually, as opposed to constructively, resides in
accordance with NRS 281.050. The Secretary of State may adopt
regulations establishing the forms of alternative proof of the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
candidate’s residential address that the filing officer may accept to
verify where the candidate actually, as opposed to constructively,
resides in accordance with NRS 281.050.
5. The filing officer shall retain a copy of the proof of identity
and residency provided by the candidate pursuant to subsection 3 or
4. Such a copy:
(a) May not be withheld from the public; and
(b) Must not contain the social security number, driver’s license
or identification card number or account number of the candidate.
6. By filing the declaration of candidacy, the candidate shall be
deemed to have appointed the filing officer for the office as his or
her agent for service of process for the purposes of a proceeding
pursuant to NRS 293.182. Service of such process must first be
attempted at the appropriate address as specified by the candidate in
the declaration of candidacy. If the candidate cannot be served at
that address, service must be made by personally delivering to and
leaving with the filing officer duplicate copies of the process. The
filing officer shall immediately send, by registered or certified mail,
one of the copies to the candidate at the specified address, unless the
candidate has designated in writing to the filing officer a different
address for that purpose, in which case the filing officer shall mail
the copy to the last address so designated.
7. A declaration of candidacy filed pursuant to this section is
a public record and the filing officer shall make the declaration of
candidacy available to the public in an electronic format.
8. If the filing officer receives credible evidence indicating that
a candidate has been convicted of a felony and has not had his or her
civil rights restored, the filing officer:
(a) May conduct an investigation to determine whether the
candidate has been convicted of a felony and, if so, whether the
candidate has had his or her civil rights restored; and
(b) Shall transmit the credible evidence and the findings from
such investigation to the Attorney General, if the filing officer is the
Secretary of State, or to the district attorney, if the filing officer is a
person other than the Secretary of State.
[8.] 9. The receipt of information by the Attorney General or
district attorney pursuant to subsection [7] 8 must be treated as a
challenge of a candidate pursuant to subsections 4 and 5 of NRS
293.182 to which the provisions of NRS 293.2045 apply.
[9.] 10. Any person who knowingly and willfully files a
declaration of candidacy which contains a false statement in
violation of this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
Sec. 4. NRS 293.181 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.181 1. A candidate for the office of State Senator,
Assemblyman or Assemblywoman must execute and file, with his
or her declaration of candidacy, a declaration of residency which
must be in substantially the following form:
I, the undersigned, do swear or affirm under penalty of
perjury that I have been a citizen resident of this State as
required by NRS 218A.200; that I understand that knowingly
and willfully filing a declaration of residency which contains
a false statement is a crime punishable as a gross
misdemeanor and also subjects me to a civil action
disqualifying me from entering upon the duties of the office;
and that I have actually, as opposed to constructively, resided
at the following residence or residences since November 1 of
the preceding year:
......................................... ..................................................
Street Address Street Address
......................................... ..................................................
City or Town City or Town
......................................... ..................................................
State State
From ........... To ............ From ............... To ...................
Dates of Residency Dates of Residency
......................................... ..................................................
Street Address Street Address
......................................... ..................................................
City or Town City or Town
......................................... ..................................................
State State
From ........... To ............ From ............... To ...................
Dates of Residency Dates of Residency
(Attach additional sheet or sheets of residences as necessary)
2. Each address of a candidate which must be included in the
declaration of residency pursuant to subsection 1 must be the street
address of the residence where the candidate actually, as opposed to
constructively, resided or resides in accordance with NRS 281.050,
if one has been assigned. The declaration of residency must not be
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
accepted for filing if any of the candidate’s addresses are listed as a
post office box unless a street address has not been assigned to the
residence.
3. A declaration of residency filed pursuant to this section is a
public record and the filing officer shall make the declaration of
residency available to the public in an electronic format.
4. Any person who knowingly and willfully files a declaration
of residency which contains a false statement in violation of this
section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
Sec. 5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6. NRS 293C.185 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293C.185 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293C.190,
a name may not be printed on a ballot to be used at a primary or
general city election unless the person named has, in accordance
with NRS 293C.145 or 293C.175, as applicable, timely filed a
declaration of candidacy with the appropriate filing officer and paid
the filing fee established by the governing body of the city.
2. A declaration of candidacy required to be filed pursuant to
this chapter must be in substantially the following form:
DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY OF ........ FOR THE
OFFICE OF ................
State of Nevada
City of ..............................
For the purpose of having my name placed on the official
ballot as a candidate for the office of .................., I,
.................., the undersigned do swear or affirm under penalty
of perjury that I actually, as opposed to constructively, reside
at .................., in the City or Town of .................., County of
.................., State of Nevada; that my actual, as opposed to
constructive, residence in the city, township or other area
prescribed by law to which the office pertains began on a date
at least 30 days immediately preceding the date of the close
of filing of declarations of candidacy for this office; that my
telephone number is .................., and the address at which I
receive mail, if different than my residence, is ..................;
that I am a qualified elector pursuant to Section 1 of Article 2
of the Constitution of the State of Nevada; that I am
registered to vote in the City or Town of .................., County
of .................., State of Nevada; that if I have ever been
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
convicted of treason or a felony, my civil rights have been
restored; that if nominated as a candidate at the ensuing
election I will accept the nomination and not withdraw; that I
will not knowingly violate any election law or any law
defining and prohibiting corrupt and fraudulent practices in
campaigns and elections in this State; that I will qualify for
the office if elected thereto, including, but not limited to,
complying with any limitation prescribed by the Constitution
and laws of this State concerning the number of years or
terms for which a person may hold the office; that I
understand that knowingly and willfully filing a declaration
of candidacy which contains a false statement is a crime
punishable as a gross misdemeanor and also subjects me to a
civil action disqualifying me from entering upon the duties of
the office; and that I understand that my name will appear on
all ballots as designated in this declaration.
................................................................
(Designation of name)
................................................................
(Signature of candidate for office)
Subscribed and sworn to before me
this ...... day of the month of ...... of the year ......
......................................................................
Notary Public or other person
authorized to administer an oath
3. The address of a candidate that must be included in the
declaration of candidacy pursuant to subsection 2 must be the street
address of the residence where the candidate actually, as opposed to
constructively, resides in accordance with NRS 281.050, if one has
been assigned. The declaration of candidacy must not be accepted
for filing if the candidate fails to comply with the following
provisions of this subsection or, if applicable, the provisions of
subsection 4:
(a) The candidate shall not list the candidate’s address as a post
office box unless a street address has not been assigned to the
residence; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the candidate
shall present to the filing officer:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
(1) A valid driver’s license or identification card issued by a
governmental agency that contains a photograph of the candidate
and the candidate’s residential address; or
(2) A current utility bill, bank statement, paycheck, or
document issued by a governmental entity, including a check which
indicates the candidate’s name and residential address, but not
including a voter registration card.
4. If the candidate executes an oath or affirmation under
penalty of perjury stating that the candidate is unable to present to
the filing officer the proof of residency required by subsection 3
because a street address has not been assigned to the candidate’s
residence or because the rural or remote location of the candidate’s
residence makes it impracticable to present the proof of residency
required by subsection 3, the candidate shall present to the filing
officer:
(a) A valid driver’s license or identification card issued by a
governmental agency that contains a photograph of the candidate;
and
(b) Alternative proof of the candidate’s residential address that
the filing officer determines is sufficient to verify where the
candidate actually, as opposed to constructively, resides in
accordance with NRS 281.050. The Secretary of State may adopt
regulations establishing the forms of alternative proof of the
candidate’s residential address that the filing officer may accept to
verify where the candidate actually, as opposed to constructively,
resides in accordance with NRS 281.050.
5. The filing officer shall retain a copy of the proof of identity
and residency provided by the candidate pursuant to subsection 3 or
4. Such a copy:
(a) May not be withheld from the public; and
(b) Must not contain the social security number, driver’s license
or identification card number or account number of the candidate.
6. By filing the declaration of candidacy, the candidate shall be
deemed to have appointed the city clerk as his or her agent for
service of process for the purposes of a proceeding pursuant to NRS
293C.186. Service of such process must first be attempted at the
appropriate address as specified by the candidate in the declaration
of candidacy. If the candidate cannot be served at that address,
service must be made by personally delivering to and leaving with
the city clerk duplicate copies of the process. The city clerk shall
immediately send, by registered or certified mail, one of the copies
to the candidate at the specified address, unless the candidate has
designated in writing to the city clerk a different address for that
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
purpose, in which case the city clerk shall mail the copy to the last
address so designated.
7. A declaration of candidacy filed pursuant to this section is
a public record and the filing officer shall make the declaration of
candidacy available to the public in an electronic format.
8. If the city clerk receives credible evidence indicating that a
candidate has been convicted of a felony and has not had his or her
civil rights restored, the city clerk:
(a) May conduct an investigation to determine whether the
candidate has been convicted of a felony and, if so, whether the
candidate has had his or her civil rights restored; and
(b) Shall transmit the credible evidence and the findings from
such investigation to the city attorney.
[8.] 9. The receipt of information by the city attorney pursuant
to subsection [7] 8 must be treated as a challenge of a candidate
pursuant to subsections 4 and 5 of NRS 293C.186 to which the
provisions of NRS 293.2045 apply.
[9.] 10. Any person who knowingly and willfully files a
declaration of candidacy which contains a false statement in
violation of this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
Sec. 7. NRS 2.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
2.020 1. A person may not be a candidate for or be eligible to
the office of justice of the Supreme Court unless the person:
(a) Has attained the age of 25 years.
(b) Is an attorney licensed and admitted to practice law in the
courts of this State at the time of the election or appointment.
(c) Has been an attorney licensed and admitted to practice law in
the courts of this State, another state or the District of Columbia for
not less than 15 years at any time preceding the election or
appointment, at least 2 years of which have been in this State.
(d) Is a qualified elector and has been a bona fide resident of this
State for 2 years next preceding the election or appointment.
(e) Is registered to vote in this State.
(f) Has not ever been removed from any judicial office by the
Legislature or removed or retired from any judicial office by the
Commission on Judicial Discipline.
2. For the purposes of this section, a person is eligible to be a
candidate for the office of justice of the Supreme Court if a decision
to remove or retire the person from a judicial office is pending
appeal before the Supreme Court or has been overturned by the
Supreme Court.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
Sec. 8. NRS 2A.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
2A.020 1. A person may not be a candidate or be eligible for
the office of judge of the Court of Appeals unless the person:
(a) Has attained the age of 25 years.
(b) Is an attorney licensed and admitted to practice law in the
courts of this State at the time of the election or appointment.
(c) Has been an attorney licensed and admitted to practice law in
the courts of this State, another state or the District of Columbia for
not less than 15 years at any time preceding the election or
appointment, at least 2 years of which have been in this State.
(d) Is a qualified elector and has been a bona fide resident of this
State for 2 years next preceding the election or appointment.
(e) Is registered to vote in this State.
(f) Has not ever been removed from any judicial office by the
Legislature or removed or retired from any judicial office by the
Commission on Judicial Discipline.
2. For the purposes of this section, a person is eligible to be a
candidate for the office of judge of the Court of Appeals if a
decision to remove or retire the person from a judicial office is
pending appeal before the Supreme Court or has been overturned by
the Supreme Court.
Sec. 9. NRS 3.060 is hereby amended to read as follows:
3.060 1. A person may not be a candidate for and is not
eligible to the office of district judge unless the person:
(a) Has attained the age of 25 years.
(b) Is an attorney licensed and admitted to practice law in the
courts of this State at the time of the election or appointment.
(c) Has been an attorney licensed and admitted to practice law in
the courts of this State, another state or the District of Columbia for
a total of not less than 10 years at any time preceding the election or
appointment, at least 2 years of which have been in this State.
(d) Is a qualified elector and has been a bona fide resident of this
State for 2 years next preceding the election or appointment.
(e) Is registered to vote in this State.
(f) Has not ever been removed from any judicial office by the
Legislature or removed or retired from any judicial office by the
Commission on Judicial Discipline.
2. For the purposes of this section, a person is eligible to be a
candidate for the office of district judge if a decision to remove or
retire the person from a judicial office is pending appeal before the
Supreme Court or has been overturned by the Supreme Court.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
Sec. 10. NRS 4.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
4.010 1. A person may not be a candidate for or be eligible to
the office of justice of the peace unless the person is a qualified
elector , is registered to vote in the township and has never been
removed or retired from any judicial office by the Commission on
Judicial Discipline. For the purposes of this subsection, a person is
eligible to be a candidate for the office of justice of the peace if a
decision to remove or retire the person from a judicial office is
pending appeal before the Supreme Court or has been overturned by
the Supreme Court.
2. A justice of the peace must have a high school diploma or its
equivalent as determined by the State Board of Education.
3. In addition to any other requirement provided by law or a
court rule, a justice of the peace who is not licensed or admitted to
practice law in the courts of this State at the time of his or her
election or appointment must pass an examination prescribed by the
Nevada Supreme Court within 18 months after taking the official
oath. The examination must test the competency of the examinee’s
knowledge on subject matters related to the duties of a justice of the
peace, including, without limitation:
(a) Judicial decorum;
(b) Application of the Revised Nevada Code of Judicial
Conduct;
(c) Criminal and civil actions and proceedings over which a
justice court has jurisdiction, including, without limitation, the
issuance of temporary or extended orders for protection; and
(d) The financial administration of a court, including, without
limitation, the minimum accounting standards of a justice court.
4. In a county whose population is 100,000 or more, a justice
of the peace in a township whose population is 100,000 or more
must be an attorney who:
(a) Is licensed and admitted to practice law in the courts of this
State at the time of his or her election or appointment; and
(b) Has been licensed and admitted to practice law in the courts
of this State, another state or the District of Columbia for not less
than 5 years at any time preceding his or her election or
appointment.
5. Subsections 2 and 4 do not apply to any person who held the
office of justice of the peace on June 30, 2001.
Sec. 11. NRS 5.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
5.020 1. Except as provided in subsection 3 and NRS
266.405, each municipal judge must be chosen by the electors of the
city within which the municipal court is established on a day to be
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
fixed by the governing body of that city. The term of office of a
municipal judge is the period fixed by:
(a) An ordinance adopted by the city if the city is organized
under general law; or
(b) The charter of the city if the city is organized under a special
charter.
 Before entering upon his or her duties, a municipal judge shall
take the constitutional oath of office.
2. A municipal judge must:
(a) Be a citizen of the State;
(b) Except as otherwise provided in the charter of a city
organized under a special charter, have been a bona fide resident of
the city for not less than 1 year next preceding his or her election;
(c) Be a qualified elector in the city;
(d) Be registered to vote in the city; and
[(d)] (e) Not have ever been removed or retired from any
judicial office by the Commission on Judicial Discipline.
3. The governing body of a city, with the consent of the board
of county commissioners and the justice of the peace, may provide
that a justice of the peace of the township in which the city is
located is ex officio the municipal judge of the city.
4. For the purposes of this section, a person shall not be
ineligible to be a candidate for the office of municipal judge if a
decision to remove or retire the person from a judicial office is
pending appeal before the Supreme Court or has been overturned by
the Supreme Court.
Sec. 12. NRS 218A.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218A.200 A person is not eligible to be elected or appointed to
office as a Legislator unless the person:
1. Is a qualified elector;
2. Has been an actual, as opposed to constructive, citizen
resident of this State for 1 year next preceding the person’s election
or appointment;
3. At the time of election or appointment, has attained the age
of 21 years;
4. Is registered to vote in the district the office represents; and
[4.] 5. Meets all other qualifications for the office as required
by the Constitution and laws of this State.
Sec. 13. NRS 218A.264 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218A.264 1. If a person is nominated pursuant to NRS
218A.260 or 218A.262, or a person files an application with any
board of county commissioners to fill a vacancy in the office of a
Legislator pursuant to NRS 218A.262, the person must execute and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
file with the board of county commissioners, a declaration of
eligibility that must be in substantially the following form:
For the purpose of applying to fill the vacancy in the office of
a Legislator in the following legislative district, ................
(name of assembly or senatorial district), I, the undersigned
................, do swear or affirm under penalty of perjury that I
actually, as opposed to constructively, reside at ................, in
the City or Town of ................, County of ................, State of
Nevada; that, as required by NRS 218A.260, my actual, as
opposed to constructive, residence in that legislative district
began on a date at least 30 days immediately preceding the
date of nomination pursuant to NRS 218A.262 or the date
established pursuant to NRS 218A.262 for the close of filing
of applications to fill the vacancy, as applicable; that my
telephone number is ................, and the address at which I
receive mail, if different than my residence, is ................; that
I am registered as a member of the ................ Party; that I am
a qualified elector pursuant to Section 1 of Article 2 of the
Constitution of the State of Nevada; that if I have ever been
convicted of treason or a felony, my civil rights have been
restored; that I will otherwise qualify for the office if
appointed thereto, including, but not limited to, complying
with any limitation prescribed by the Constitution of this
State concerning the number of years or terms for which a
person may hold the office; that I understand that knowingly
and willfully filing a declaration of eligibility which contains
a false statement is a crime punishable as a gross
misdemeanor; and that, as required by NRS 218A.200, I am
registered to vote in the City or Town of ......., County of
.........., State of Nevada and I will have been an actual, as
opposed to constructive, citizen resident of this State for 1
year immediately preceding the date of my appointment and
that, during such period, I will have resided at the following
residence or residences:
......................................... ..................................................
Street Address Street Address
......................................... ..................................................
City or Town City or Town
......................................... ..................................................
State State
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 17 –
From ........... To ............ From ............... To ...................
Dates of Residency Dates of Residency
......................................... ..................................................
Street Address Street Address
......................................... ..................................................
City or Town City or Town
......................................... ..................................................
State State
From ........... To ............ From ............... To ...................
Dates of Residency Dates of Residency
(Attach additional sheet or sheets of residences as necessary)
................................................................
(Name of applicant)
................................................................
(Signature of applicant)
Subscribed and sworn to before me
this ...... day of the month of ...... of the year ......
......................................................................
Notary Public or other person
authorized to administer an oath
2. Each address of the applicant that must be included in the
declaration of eligibility pursuant to subsection 1 must be the street
address of the residence where the applicant actually, as opposed to
constructively, resided or resides in accordance with NRS 281.050,
if one has been assigned. The declaration of eligibility must not be
accepted for filing if any of the applicant’s addresses are listed as a
post office box unless a street address has not been assigned to the
residence.
3. A declaration of eligibility filed pursuant to this section is a
public record and the filing officer shall make the declaration of
eligibility available to the public in an electronic format.
4. Any person who does not submit a declaration of eligibility
pursuant to this section is ineligible to fill the vacancy of the former
Legislator.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 18 –
[4.] 5. Any person who knowingly and willfully files a
declaration of eligibility that contains a false statement in violation
of this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
Sec. 14. NRS 223.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
223.010 No person shall be eligible to the Office of Governor
unless the person:
1. Has attained the age of 25 years at the time of such election;
[and]
2. Is a qualified elector and has been a citizen resident of this
State for 2 years next preceding the election [.] ; and
3. Is registered to vote in this State.
Sec. 15. NRS 224.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
224.010 No person shall be eligible to the Office of Lieutenant
Governor unless the person:
1. Has attained the age of 25 years at the time of such election;
[and]
2. Is a qualified elector and has been a citizen resident of this
State for 2 years next preceding the election [.] ; and
3. Is registered to vote in this State.
Sec. 16. NRS 225.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
225.010 No person shall be eligible to the Office of Secretary
of State unless the person:
1. Has attained the age of 25 years at the time of such election;
[and]
2. Is a qualified elector and has been a citizen resident of this
State for 2 years next preceding the election [.] ; and
3. Is registered to vote in this State.
Sec. 17. NRS 226.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
226.010 No person shall be eligible to the Office of State
Treasurer unless the person:
1. Has attained the age of 25 years at the time of such election;
[and]
2. Is a qualified elector and has been a citizen resident of this
State for 2 years next preceding the election [.] ; and
3. Is registered to vote in this State.
Sec. 18. NRS 227.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
227.010 No person shall be eligible to the Office of State
Controller unless the person:
1. Has attained the age of 25 years at the time of such election;
[and]
2. Is a qualified elector and has been a citizen resident of this
State for 2 years next preceding the election [.] ; and
3. Is registered to vote in this State.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 19 –
Sec. 19. NRS 228.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
228.010 No person shall be eligible to the Office of Attorney
General unless the person:
1. Has attained the age of 30 years at the time of such election;
2. Is a qualified elector and has been a citizen resident of this
State for 3 years next preceding the election;
3. Is registered to vote in this State; and
[3.] 4. Is a member of the State Bar of Nevada in good
standing.
Sec. 20. NRS 244.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
244.020 1. County commissioners must [be] :
(a) Be qualified electors of their respective counties ;
(b) Be registered to vote in the county; and [have]
(c) Have such other qualifications as are provided in this
chapter.
2. No county or township officer is eligible to the office of
county commissioner.
Sec. 21. NRS 246.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
246.010 1. County clerks shall be elected by the qualified
electors of their respective counties.
2. County clerks must be registered to vote in the county.
3. County clerks shall be chosen by the electors of their
respective counties at the general election in 1922, and at the
general election every 4 years thereafter, and shall enter upon the
duties of their respective offices on the first Monday of January
subsequent to their election.
Sec. 22. NRS 247.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
247.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 or
as altered pursuant to the mechanism set forth in NRS 244.1507,
county recorders must be [elected] :
(a) Elected by the qualified electors of their respective counties
[.] ; and
(b) Registered to vote in the county.
2. County recorders must be chosen by the electors of their
respective counties at the general election in 1922, and at the
general election every 4 years thereafter, and shall enter upon the
duties of their respective offices on the first Monday of January
subsequent to their election.
3. The Clerk of Carson City is ex officio the Recorder of
Carson City.
Sec. 23. NRS 248.005 is hereby amended to read as follows:
248.005 1. No person is eligible to the office of sheriff unless
the person:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 20 –
(a) Will have attained the age of 21 years on the date he or she
would take office if so elected;
(b) Is a qualified elector;
(c) Is registered to vote in the county which the office
represents; and
[(c)] (d) On or after January 1, 2010, meets the requirements set
forth in subsection 2 or 3, as applicable.
2. If a person described in paragraph [(c)] (d) of subsection 1 is
a candidate for the office of sheriff in a county whose population is
30,000 or more, the person must meet the following requirements at
the time he or she files his or her declaration of candidacy for the
office:
(a) He or she has a history of at least 5 consecutive years of
employment or service:
(1) As a peace officer;
(2) As a law enforcement officer of an agency of the United
States;
(3) As a law enforcement officer of another state or political
subdivision thereof; or
(4) In any combination of the positions described in
subparagraphs (1), (2) and (3); and
(b) He or she has:
(1) Been certified as a category I peace officer by the
Commission;
(2) Been certified as a category I peace officer or its
equivalent by the certifying authority of another state that, as
determined by the Commission, imposes requirements for
certification as a category I peace officer in this State; or
(3) Successfully completed a federal law enforcement
training program approved by the Commission.
3. If a person described in paragraph [(c)] (d) of subsection 1 is
a candidate for the office of sheriff in a county whose population is
less than 30,000, the person is not required to meet any requirements
with respect to employment, service, certification or training at the
time he or she files his or her declaration of candidacy for the office.
However, such a person forfeits his or her office if, within 1 year
after the date on which the person takes office, the person fails to
earn certification by the Commission as a category I peace officer,
category II peace officer or category III peace officer.
4. A person who has been convicted of a felony in this State or
any other state is not qualified to be a candidate for or elected or
appointed to the office of sheriff regardless of whether the person
has been restored to his or her civil rights.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 21 –
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Category I peace officer” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 289.460.
(b) “Category II peace officer” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 289.470.
(c) “Category III peace officer” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 289.480.
(d) “Commission” means the Peace Officers’ Standards and
Training Commission created pursuant to NRS 289.500.
(e) “Declaration of candidacy” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 293.0455.
(f) “Peace officer” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 289.010.
Sec. 24. NRS 249.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
249.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 or
as altered pursuant to the mechanism set forth in NRS 244.1507,
county treasurers must be [elected] :
(a) Elected by the qualified electors of their respective counties
[.] ; and
(b) Registered to vote in the county.
2. County treasurers must be chosen by the electors of their
respective counties at the general election in 1922, and at the
general election every 4 years thereafter, and shall enter upon the
duties of their respective offices on the first Monday of January
subsequent to their election.
3. The county clerks of Churchill, Douglas, Esmeralda, Eureka,
Lyon, Mineral, Pershing and Storey Counties are ex officio county
treasurers of their respective counties, unless such an arrangement is
altered pursuant to the mechanism set forth in NRS 244.1507.
Sec. 25. NRS 250.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
250.010 1. County assessors shall be elected by the qualified
electors of their counties.
2. County assessors must be registered to vote in the county.
3. County assessors shall be chosen by the electors of their
respective counties at the general election in 1922, and at the
general election every 4 years thereafter, and shall enter upon the
duties of their offices on the first Monday of January subsequent to
their election.
Sec. 26. NRS 252.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
252.010 No person shall be a candidate for or be eligible to the
office of district attorney unless the person is:
1. A bona fide resident of the State of Nevada.
2. Registered to vote in this State.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 22 –
3. An attorney duly licensed and admitted to practice law in all
the courts of this State.
Sec. 27. NRS 253.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
253.010 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 253.125:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 4 and 5 or as
altered pursuant to the mechanism set forth in NRS 244.1507, public
administrators must be elected by the qualified electors of their
respective counties.
2. Public administrators must be chosen by the electors of their
respective counties at the general election in 1922 and at the general
election every 4 years thereafter, and shall enter upon the duties of
their office on the first Monday of January after their election.
3. The public administrator of a county must:
(a) Be a qualified elector of the county;
(b) Be registered to vote in the county;
(c) Be at least 21 years of age on the date he or she will take
office;
[(c)] (d) Not have been convicted of a felony for which his or
her civil rights have not been restored; and
[(d)] (e) Not have been found liable in a civil action involving a
finding of fraud, misrepresentation, material omission,
misappropriation, theft or conversion.
4. The district attorneys of Humboldt, Lander, Lincoln, Storey
and White Pine Counties are ex officio public administrators of
Humboldt County, Lander County, Lincoln County, Storey County
and White Pine County, respectively, unless such an arrangement is
altered pursuant to the mechanism set forth in NRS 244.1507. The
Clerk of Carson City shall serve as Public Administrator of Carson
City.
5. In a county other than Carson City and Humboldt, Lander,
Lincoln, Storey and White Pine Counties, if, for any reason, the
office of public administrator becomes vacant, the board of county
commissioners may appoint a public administrator for the remainder
of the unexpired term.
Sec. 28. NRS 258.005 is hereby amended to read as follows:
258.005 1. No person is eligible to the office of constable
unless the person:
(a) Will have attained the age of 21 years on the date he or she
would take office if so elected or appointed; [and]
(b) Is a qualified elector [.] ; and
(c) Is registered to vote in the township which the office
represents.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 23 –
2. A person who has been convicted of a felony in this state or
any other state is not qualified to be a candidate for or elected or
appointed to the office of constable regardless of whether the person
has been restored to his or her civil rights.
Sec. 29. NRS 266.170 is hereby amended to read as follows:
266.170 Mayors shall be [qualified] :
1. Qualified electors within their respective cities and shall
have been actually bona fide residents [thereof] for a period of at
least 1 year next preceding their election [.] ; and
2. Registered to vote in their respective cities.
Sec. 30. NRS 266.215 is hereby amended to read as follows:
266.215 Council members must be:
1. Qualified electors within their respective cities and bona fide
residents thereof for a period of at least 1 year next preceding their
election.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 266.220, qualified
electors within their respective wards.
3. Registered to vote in their respective wards or in the city, if
elected by the voters of the city at large pursuant to NRS 266.020.
Sec. 31. NRS 267.030 is hereby amended to read as follows:
267.030 Whenever the qualified voters of any incorporated city
desiring to adopt a commission form of government so declare their
desire by filing with the governing body of that city a petition
having the signatures of one-fourth of the qualified voters voting at
the last city election, the governing body shall cause 15 qualified
electors to be elected at the next primary or general municipal
election or primary or general state election to frame a charter which
provides for a commission form of government for the city. The
persons elected must [have] :
1. Have been residents of the city for at least 2 years preceding
their election [.] ; and
2. Be registered to vote in the city.
Sec. 32. NRS 269.017 is hereby amended to read as follows:
269.017 1. If the board of county commissioners determines
that the best interests of an unincorporated town would be served by
adoption of a town board form of government it shall establish a
town board for the town by appointing five persons who are
residents and qualified electors in the town to serve as members of
the town board until successors can be elected at the next general
election.
2. At the next general election five persons who are residents ,
[and] qualified electors in the town and registered to vote in the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 24 –
town must be elected by the registered voters of the town to serve as
members of the town board.
Sec. 33. NRS 269.0171 is hereby amended to read as follows:
269.0171 1. If the establishment of a town board form of
government is proposed by initiative petition, and the proposal is
submitted to the electors, the prospective members of the town
board must be elected at the same general election in which the
proposal is submitted to the electors.
2. Any person who is a resident, is a qualified elector , is
registered to vote in the town and desires to become a candidate for
the position of member of a town board must, within the time
specified by subsection 3, file in the office of the county clerk a
notice of intention to become a candidate. The notice of intention
must show that the person possesses the qualifications required by
this section. Each person filing the notice of intention as required by
this section is entitled to have his or her name placed on the official
ballot.
3. The notice of intention required by subsection 2 must be
filed not later than 5 p.m. on the second Tuesday in May of the year
in which the election is held.
4. If the proposal to establish a town board form of government
is approved at the election, members of the town board elected
pursuant to this section serve as members until the next general
election.
Sec. 34. NRS 269.576 is hereby amended to read as follows:
269.576 1. Except as appointment may be deferred pursuant
to NRS 269.563 or 269.567, the board of county commissioners of
any county whose population is 700,000 or more shall, in each
ordinance which establishes an unincorporated town pursuant to
NRS 269.500 to 269.625, inclusive, provide for:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, appointment
by the board of county commissioners or the election by the
registered voters of the unincorporated town of three or five
qualified electors who are residents of the unincorporated town and
registered to vote in the unincorporated town to serve as the town
advisory board. If the ordinance provides for appointment by the
board of county commissioners, in making such appointments, the
board of county commissioners shall consider:
(1) The results of any poll conducted by the town advisory
board; and
(2) Any application submitted to the board of county
commissioners by persons who desire to be appointed to the town
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 25 –
advisory board in response to an announcement made by the town
advisory board.
(b) A term of 2 years for members of the town advisory board.
(c) Election of a chair from among the members of the town
advisory board for a term of 2 years, and, if a vacancy occurs in the
office of chair, for the election of a chair from among the members
for the remainder of the unexpired term. The ordinance must also
provide that a chair is not eligible to succeed himself or herself for a
term of office as chair.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, the members
of a town advisory board serve at the pleasure of the board of county
commissioners.
3. If a vacancy occurs on the town advisory board, the board of
county commissioners shall appoint a new member to serve out the
remainder of the unexpired term of the member.
4. The board of county commissioners shall provide notice of
the expiration of the term of a member of and any vacancy on a
town advisory board to the residents of the unincorporated town by
mail, newsletter or newspaper at least 30 days before the expiration
of the term or filling the vacancy.
5. The duties of the town advisory board are to:
(a) Assist the board of county commissioners in governing the
unincorporated town by acting as liaison between the residents of
the town and the board of county commissioners; and
(b) Advise the board of county commissioners on matters of
importance to the unincorporated town and its residents.
6. The board of county commissioners may provide by
ordinance for compensation for the members of the town advisory
board.
7. Except an unincorporated town established pursuant to NRS
269.567, if an unincorporated town is established in a county whose
population is 700,000 or more and is located 25 miles or more from
an incorporated city whose population is 500,000 or more:
(a) The board of county commissioners shall by ordinance
provide for the election by the registered voters of the
unincorporated town of three or five qualified electors who are
residents of the unincorporated town and registered to vote in the
unincorporated town to serve as the town advisory board. If there
are fewer qualified electors who are residents of the unincorporated
town who file for election to the town advisory board than there are
seats on the town advisory board, the board of county
commissioners shall appoint as many new members as are necessary
to fill the seats left vacant after the election.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 26 –
(b) The members of the town advisory board of the
unincorporated town do not serve at the pleasure of and may not be
removed by the board of county commissioners.
Sec. 35. NRS 269.577 is hereby amended to read as follows:
269.577 1. Except as appointment may be deferred pursuant
to NRS 269.567, the board of county commissioners of any county
whose population is less than 700,000 shall, in each ordinance
which establishes an unincorporated town pursuant to NRS 269.500
to 269.625, inclusive, provide for:
(a) The appointment by the board of county commissioners or
the election by the people of three or five qualified electors who are
residents of the unincorporated town and registered to vote in the
unincorporated town to serve as the town advisory board.
(b) The removal of a member of the town advisory board if the
board of county commissioners finds that the removal of the
member is in the best interest of the residents of the unincorporated
town.
(c) The appointment by the board of county commissioners of a
member to serve the unexpired term of a member of the town
advisory board removed pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (b)
or whose position otherwise becomes vacant.
2. The board of county commissioners may provide by
ordinance for compensation for the members of the town advisory
board.
3. The duties of the town advisory board are to:
(a) Assist the board of county commissioners in governing the
unincorporated town by acting as liaison between the residents of
the town and the board of county commissioners; and
(b) Advise the board of county commissioners on matters of
importance to the unincorporated town and its residents.
Sec. 36. NRS 281.040 is hereby amended to read as follows:
281.040 1. No person who is not a qualified elector shall be
eligible to any office of honor, profit or trust in and under the
government and laws of this State.
2. No person who is not registered to vote in the State,
district, county, township or other area prescribed by law in which
the officer is required to reside shall be eligible to any elected
office of the State or a local government.
Sec. 37. NRS 318.080 is hereby amended to read as follows:
318.080 1. After adopting an ordinance creating a district and
before appointing the first board of trustees for the district, the board
of county commissioners is, ex officio, the board of trustees for the
district.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 27 –
2. While acting as the board of trustees, the board of county
commissioners shall establish:
(a) Accounting practices and procedures for the district;
(b) Auditing practices and procedures to be used by the district;
(c) A budget for the district; and
(d) Management standards for the district.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 318.0953 and
318.09533, after the board of county commissioners has performed
the duties required by subsection 2, it shall appoint five persons to
serve as the first board of trustees of the district and shall specify
therein the terms of office to the first Monday in January next
following the respective election dates provided in NRS 318.095.
Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, these persons must be
qualified electors of the district [.] and registered to vote in the
district.
4. The members of the board of trustees shall qualify by filing
with the county clerk their oaths of office and corporate surety
bonds, at the expense of the district, the bonds to be in an amount
not more than $10,000 each, the form and exact amount thereof to
be approved and determined, respectively, by the board of county
commissioners, conditioned for the faithful performance of their
duties as trustees. The board of county commissioners may from
time to time, upon good cause shown, increase or decrease the
amount of the bond.
5. The board of county commissioners may appoint as one of
the five initial trustees as provided by subsection 1 the district
attorney for the county or a deputy district attorney on his or her
staff. Such appointee need not be a qualified elector of the district,
but no such attorney is qualified for appointment to fill any vacancy
on the board pursuant to NRS 318.090 or qualified as a candidate
for election to the board at any biennial election pursuant to NRS
318.095 unless he or she is a qualified elector of the district.
6. The board of county commissioners of the county vested
with jurisdiction pursuant to NRS 318.050 may remove any trustee
serving on an appointed or elected board of trustees for cause
shown, on petition, hearing and notice thereof by publication and by
mail addressed to the trustee.
Sec. 38. NRS 318.083 is hereby amended to read as follows:
318.083 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the board of trustees of a district organized or reorganized
pursuant to this chapter that exists on July 1, 2009, that is authorized
only to exercise the basic power of furnishing electric light and
power pursuant to NRS 318.117 in a county whose population is
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 28 –
700,000 or more, and for which the board of county commissioners
of the county is not ex officio the board of trustees, shall consist of
seven trustees. The members of the board of trustees must be
registered to vote in the district.
2. The members of the board of trustees described in
subsection 1 must be selected as follows:
(a) One member who is elected by the qualified electors of the
largest incorporated city in the district at the first biennial election
following July 1, 2009. The term of office of a trustee who is elected
pursuant to this paragraph is 4 years.
(b) One member who is elected by the qualified electors of the
district at the first biennial election following July 1, 2009. The
initial term of office of a trustee who is elected pursuant to this
paragraph is 2 years. After the initial term, the term of office of a
trustee who is elected pursuant to this paragraph is 4 years.
(c) Five members who are elected from the election areas in the
district created pursuant to NRS 318.0952 that existed on July 1,
2009, each of whom serves for a term of 4 years.
3. Each member of the board of trustees must be a resident of
the area which he or she seeks to represent.
4. A majority of the members of the board constitutes a
quorum at any meeting.
Sec. 39. NRS 318.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
318.090 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 318.0953 and
318.09533:
1. The board shall, by resolution, designate the place where the
office or principal place of the district is to be located, which must
be within the corporate limits of the district and which may be
changed by resolution of the board. Copies of all those resolutions
must be filed with the county clerk or clerks of the county or
counties wherein the district is located within 5 days after their
adoption. The official records and files of the district must be kept at
that office and must be open to public inspection as provided in
NRS 239.010.
2. The board of trustees shall meet regularly at least once each
year, and at such other times at the office or principal place of the
district as provided in the bylaws.
3. Special meetings may be held on notice to each member of
the board as often as, and at such places within the district as, the
needs of the district require.
4. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 318.083, three
members of the board constitute a quorum at any meeting.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 29 –
5. A vacancy on the board must be filled by a qualified elector
of the district who is registered to vote in the district and chosen by
the remaining members of the board, the appointee to act until a
successor in office qualifies as provided in NRS 318.080 on or after
the first Monday in January next following the next biennial
election, held in accordance with NRS 318.083 or 318.095, at which
election the vacancy must be filled by election if the term of office
extends beyond that first Monday in January. Nominations of
qualified electors of the district as candidates to fill unexpired terms
of 2 years may be made the same as nominations for regular terms
of 4 years, as provided in NRS 318.083 and 318.095. If the board
fails, neglects or refuses to fill any vacancy within 30 days after the
vacancy occurs, the board of county commissioners shall fill that
vacancy.
6. Each term of office of 4 years terminates on the first
Monday in January next following the general election at which a
successor in office is elected, as provided in NRS 318.083 or
318.095. The successor’s term of office commences then or as soon
thereafter as the successor qualifies as provided in NRS 318.080,
subject to the provisions in this chapter for initial appointments to a
board, for appointments to fill vacancies of unexpired terms and for
the reorganizations of districts under this chapter which were
organized under other chapters of NRS.
Sec. 40. NRS 318.095 is hereby amended to read as follows:
318.095 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 318.0953:
1. There must be held simultaneously with the first general
election in the county after the creation of the district and
simultaneously with every general election thereafter an election to
be known as the biennial election of the district. The election must
be conducted under the supervision of the county clerk or registrar
of voters. A district shall reimburse the county clerk or registrar of
voters for the costs he or she incurred in conducting the election for
the district.
2. The office of trustee is a nonpartisan office. The general
election laws of this State govern the candidacy, nominations and
election of a member of the board. The names of the candidates for
trustee of a district may be placed on the ballot for the primary or
general election. A candidate for the office of trustee must be a
registered voter in the district.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 318.083, at the first
biennial election in any district organized or reorganized and
operating under this chapter and each fourth year thereafter, there
must be elected by the qualified electors of the district two qualified
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 30 –
electors as members of the board to serve for terms of 4 years. At
the second biennial election and each fourth year thereafter, there
must be so elected three qualified electors as members of the board
to serve for terms of 4 years.
4. The secretary of the district shall give notice of election by
publication and shall arrange such other details in connection
therewith as the county clerk or registrar of voters may direct.
5. Any new member of the board must qualify in the same
manner as members of the first board qualify.
Sec. 41. NRS 318.0952 is hereby amended to read as follows:
318.0952 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 318.0953:
1. Trustees may be elected in the alternate manner provided in
this section from election areas within the district.
2. Within 30 days before May 1 of any year in which a general
election is to be held in the State, 10 percent or more of the qualified
electors of the district voting at the next preceding biennial election
of the district may file a written petition with the board of county
commissioners of the county vested with jurisdiction under NRS
318.050 praying for the creation of election areas within the district
in the manner provided in this section. The petition must specify
with particularity the five areas proposed to be created. The
description of the proposed election areas need not be given by
metes and bounds or by legal subdivisions, but must be sufficient to
enable a person to ascertain what territory is proposed to be included
within a particular area. The signatures to the petition need not all be
appended to one paper, but each signer must add to the signer’s
name his or her place of residence, giving the street and number
whenever practicable. One of the signers of each paper shall take an
oath, before a person competent to administer oaths, that each
signature to the paper appended is the genuine signature of the
person whose name it purports to be.
3. Immediately after the receipt of the petition, the board of
county commissioners shall fix a date for a public hearing to be held
during the month of May, and shall give notice thereof by
publication at least once in a newspaper published in the county, or
if no such newspaper is published therein then in a newspaper
published in the State of Nevada and having a general circulation in
the county. The costs of publication of that notice are a proper
charge against the district fund.
4. If, as a result of the public hearing, the board of county
commissioners finds that the creation of election areas within the
district is desirable, the board of county commissioners shall, by
resolution regularly adopted before June 1, divide the district into
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 31 –
the areas specified in the petition, designate them by number and
define their boundaries. The territory comprising each election area
must be contiguous. One trustee must be elected from each election
area by a majority of the qualified electors voting on the candidates
for any vacancy for that area as provided in subsection 7.
5. Before June 1 and immediately following the adoption of the
resolution creating election areas within a district, the clerk of
the board of county commissioners shall transmit a certified copy of
the resolution to the secretary of the district.
6. Upon the creation of election areas within a district, the
terms of office of all trustees then in office expire on the first
Monday of January thereafter next following a biennial election. At
the biennial election held following the creation of election areas
within a district, district trustees to represent the odd-numbered
election areas must be elected for terms of 4 years and district
trustees to represent the even-numbered election areas must be
elected for terms of 2 years. Thereafter, at each biennial election, the
offices of trustees must be filled for terms of 4 years in the order in
which the terms of office expire.
7. Candidates for election as a trustee representing any election
area must be elected only by those qualified electors of the district
residing in that area. No qualified elector may vote in more than one
election area at any one time.
8. A candidate for the office of trustee of a district in which
election areas have been created must be [a] :
(a) A qualified elector of the district [and must be a] ;
(b) A resident of the election area which the candidate seeks to
represent [.] ; and
(c) Registered to vote in the district.
9. Election areas may be altered or abolished in the same
manner as provided in this section for the creation of election areas
and the election of trustees therefor.
Sec. 42. NRS 318.09535 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
318.09535 1. Whenever a board of county commissioners is
the board of trustees of any district organized or reorganized
pursuant to this chapter or is exercising any powers pursuant to NRS
244.157, the board may by ordinance establish a local district
managing board for the district.
2. Such a local district managing board must consist of not less
than 5 members and not more than 12 members who are qualified
electors of the district [.] and registered to vote in the district. The
members must be:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 32 –
(a) Appointed by the board of county commissioners; or
(b) Elected by the qualified electors of the district.
3. If the local district managing board is elective, the initial
appointments and subsequent elections must be conducted in the
manner provided in this chapter for trustees of a district.
4. An ordinance establishing a local district managing board
must:
(a) Provide for the compensation which members of the board
are to receive for their services;
(b) Provide for the terms of office for the members of the board;
(c) Contain a recital of the powers delegated and duties assigned
by the board of county commissioners to the local district managing
board; and
(d) Provide that the local district managing board does not have
the power to tax, issue bonds or call for an election for the issuance
of bonds. All taxes must be levied and bonds issued by the board of
county commissioners as generally provided in this chapter.
5. Any vacancy on the board must be filled by a qualified
elector of the district who is appointed by the board of county
commissioners. If the local district managing board is appointive,
the person appointed to fill the vacancy must be appointed to serve
the remainder of the unexpired term. If the board is elective, the
appointee must be appointed to serve until the first Monday in
January when his or her successor in office, elected at the biennial
election next following the vacancy, qualifies.
6. The local district managing board may be dissolved by the
board of county commissioners after notice and hearing whenever
the board of county commissioners determines:
(a) The local district managing board is no longer necessary; or
(b) The services of the district can be more effectively
performed by another district.
Sec. 43. NRS 318A.180 is hereby amended to read as follows:
318A.180 1. Except as otherwise may be provided in an
interlocal agreement entered into pursuant to NRS 318A.160, after
adopting an ordinance creating a district, the governing body must
establish:
(a) Accounting practices and procedures for the district;
(b) Auditing practices and procedures to be used by the district;
(c) A budget for the district; and
(d) Management standards for the district.
2. After the duties required by subsection 1 have been
performed, the first board of trustees of the district, consisting of
five members, must be appointed. Except as otherwise provided in
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 33 –
this subsection, each governing body of a county or city with
territory included within the district that has entered into an
interlocal agreement pursuant to NRS 318A.160 must each appoint
one member to the first board of trustees. If:
(a) More than five counties or cities have territory within the
district, the interlocal agreement entered into pursuant to NRS
318A.160 must determine which governing bodies may appoint the
five members of the first board of trustees of the district.
(b) Less than five counties or cities have territory within the
district, the governing body of each county or city must appoint one
member and the remaining members of the first board of trustees
must be appointed as determined pursuant to the terms of the
interlocal agreement entered into pursuant to NRS 318A.160.
3. The members of the first board of trustees must be qualified
electors of the district [.] and registered to vote in the district. The
trustees must determine by lot which three trustees serve 4-year
terms and which two trustees serve 2-year terms.
4. The governing body may remove any member of the first
board of trustees for cause shown unless an interlocal agreement
entered into pursuant to NRS 318A.160 otherwise prohibits such
removal.
5. All members of the board of trustees must file with the clerk
their oaths of office and corporate surety bonds, at the expense of
the district, the bonds to be in an amount not more than $10,000
each, the form and exact amount thereof to be approved and
determined, respectively, by the governing body, conditioned for the
faithful performance of their duties as trustees. The governing body
may from time to time, upon good cause shown, increase or
decrease the amount of the bond.
Sec. 44. NRS 318A.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
318A.200 1. The board shall, by resolution, designate the
place where the office or principal place of the district is to be
located, which must be within the corporate limits of the district and
which may be changed by resolution of the board. Copies of all
those resolutions must be filed with the clerk within 5 days after
their adoption. The official records and files of the district must be
kept at that office and must be open to public inspection as provided
in NRS 239.010.
2. The board of trustees shall meet regularly at least once each
year, and at such other times at the office or principal place of the
district as provided in the bylaws.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 34 –
3. Special meetings may be held on notice to each member of
the board as often as, and at such places within the district as, the
needs of the district require.
4. Three members of the board constitute a quorum at any
meeting.
5. Unless an interlocal agreement entered into pursuant to NRS
318A.160 provides otherwise, a vacancy on the board must be filled
by a qualified elector of the district who is registered to vote in the
district and chosen by the remaining members of the board.
Sec. 45. NRS 320.070 is hereby amended to read as follows:
320.070 1. After adopting a resolution creating a district, the
board of county commissioners shall appoint five persons to serve
as the initial members of the board. A member of the board
appointed pursuant to this subsection:
(a) Must be a qualified elector of the district [;] and registered to
vote in the district; and
(b) Serves in that office until his or her successor is elected
pursuant to NRS 320.080.
2. Each member of the board must qualify for appointment by
filing in the office of the county clerk where the district is located:
(a) A written oath of office signed by the member; and
(b) A bond in an amount of not more than $10,000 as
determined by the board of county commissioners. The bond must
be filed in a form approved by the board of county commissioners
and be conditioned upon the satisfactory performance of the duties
of the member filing the bond. The board of county commissioners
may, from time to time, increase or decrease the amount of the
bond.
Sec. 46. NRS 385.021 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385.021 1. The State Board of Education is hereby created.
The State Board consists of the following voting members:
(a) One member elected by the registered voters of each
congressional district described in the shapefile adopted by
NRS 304.095;
(b) One member appointed by the Governor;
(c) One member appointed by the Governor, nominated by the
Majority Leader of the Senate; and
(d) One member appointed by the Governor, nominated by the
Speaker of the Assembly.
2. In addition to the voting members described in subsection 1,
the State Board consists of the following four nonvoting members:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 35 –
(a) One member appointed by the Governor who is a member of
a board of trustees of a school district, nominated by the Nevada
Association of School Boards;
(b) One member appointed by the Governor who is the
superintendent of schools of a school district, nominated by the
Nevada Association of School Superintendents;
(c) One member appointed by the Governor who represents the
Nevada System of Higher Education, nominated by the Board of
Regents of the University of Nevada; and
(d) One member appointed by the Governor who is a pupil
enrolled in a public school in this State, nominated by the Nevada
Association of Student Councils or its successor organization and in
consultation with the Nevada Youth Legislature. After the initial
term, the term of the member appointed pursuant to this paragraph
commences on June 1 and expires on May 31 of the following year.
3. Each member of the State Board elected pursuant to
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 must be [a] :
(a) A qualified elector of the district from which that member is
elected [.] ; and
(b) Registered to vote in the district.
4. Each member appointed pursuant to paragraphs (b), (c) and
(d) of subsection 1 and each member appointed pursuant to
subsection 2 must be a resident of this State.
5. Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (a) and (c) of
subsection 2, a person who is elected to serve as an officer of this
State or any political subdivision thereof or a person appointed to
serve for the unexpired term of such an office may not serve or
continue to serve on the State Board.
6. The Governor shall ensure that the members appointed
pursuant to paragraphs (b), (c) and (d) of subsection 1 represent the
geographic diversity of this State and that:
(a) One member is a teacher at a public school selected from a
list of three candidates provided by the Nevada State Education
Association.
(b) One member is the parent or legal guardian of a pupil
enrolled in a public school.
(c) One member is a person active in a private business or
industry of this State.
7. After the initial terms, each member:
(a) Elected pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 serves a
term of 4 years. A member may be elected to serve not more than
three terms but may be appointed to serve pursuant to paragraph (b),
(c) or (d) of subsection 1 or subsection 2 after service as an elected
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 36 –
member, notwithstanding the number of terms the member served as
an elected member.
(b) Appointed pursuant to paragraphs (b), (c) and (d) of
subsection 1 serves a term of 2 years, except that each member
continues to serve until a successor is appointed. A member may be
reappointed for additional terms of 2 years in the same manner as
the original appointment.
(c) Appointed pursuant to subsection 2 serves a term of 1 year.
A member may be reappointed for additional terms of 1 year in the
same manner as the original appointment.
8. If a vacancy occurs during the term of:
(a) A member who was elected pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subsection 1, the Governor shall appoint a member to fill the
vacancy until the next general election, at which election a member
must be chosen for the balance of the unexpired term. The appointee
must be a qualified elector of the district where the vacancy occurs
[.] and registered to vote in the district.
(b) A voting member appointed pursuant to paragraph (b), (c) or
(d) of subsection 1 or a nonvoting member appointed pursuant to
subsection 2, the vacancy must be filled in the same manner as the
original appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term.
Sec. 47. NRS 386.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
386.200 1. In addition to the manner of election provided in
NRS 386.205, 386.215 and 386.225, the trustees of a county school
district may be elected from school trustee election areas in the
alternate manner provided in this section.
2. Within 30 days before May 1 of any year in which a general
election is to be held in the State, 10 percent or more of the
registered voters of a county school district in which 25,000 or
fewer pupils are enrolled may file a written petition with the board
of county commissioners of the county praying for the creation of
school trustee election areas within the county school district in the
manner provided in this section. The petition must specify with
particularity the school trustee election areas proposed to be created,
the number of trustees to be elected from each area, and the manner
of their nomination and election. The number of school trustee
election areas proposed must not exceed the number of trustees
authorized by law for the particular county school district. The
description of the proposed school trustee election areas need not be
given by metes and bounds or by legal subdivisions, but must be
sufficient to enable a person to ascertain what territory is proposed
to be included within a particular school trustee election area. The
signatures to the petition need not all be appended to one paper, but
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 37 –
each signer must add to his or her name his or her place of
residence, giving the street and number whenever practicable. One
of the signers of each paper shall swear or affirm, before a person
competent to administer oaths, that each signature to the paper
appended is the genuine signature of the person whose name it
purports to be.
3. Immediately after the receipt of the petition, the board of
county commissioners shall fix a date for a public hearing to be held
during the month of May, and shall give notice thereof by
publication at least once in a newspaper published in the county, or
if no such newspaper is published therein then in a newspaper
published in the State of Nevada and having a general circulation in
the county. The costs of publication of the notice is a proper charge
against the county school district fund.
4. If, as a result of the public hearing, the board of county
commissioners finds that the creation of school trustee election areas
within the county school district is desirable, the board of county
commissioners shall, by resolution regularly adopted before June 1,
divide the county school district into the number of school trustee
election areas specified in the petition, designate them by number
and define their boundaries. The territory comprising each school
trustee election area must be contiguous. The resolution must further
set forth the number of trustees to be elected from each school
trustee election area and the manner of their nomination and
election.
5. Before June 1 and immediately following the adoption of the
resolution creating school trustee election areas within a county
school district, the clerk of the board of county commissioners shall
transmit a certified copy of the resolution to the Superintendent of
Public Instruction.
6. Upon the creation of school trustee election areas within a
county school district the terms of office of all trustees then in office
expire on the 1st Monday of January thereafter next following a
general election. At the general election held following the creation
of school trustee election areas within a county school district,
school trustees to represent the odd-numbered school trustee
election areas must be elected for terms of 4 years and school
trustees to represent the even-numbered school trustee election areas
must be elected for terms of 2 years. Thereafter, at each general
election, the offices of school trustees must be filled for terms of 4
years in the order in which the terms of office expire.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 38 –
7. A candidate for the office of trustee of a county school
district in which school trustee election areas have been created
must be [a] :
(a) A qualified elector [and a] ;
(b) A resident of the school trustee election area which he or she
seeks to represent [.] ; and
(c) Registered to vote in the school trustee election area which
he or she seeks to represent.
8. The board of county commissioners may by resolution
change the boundaries of school trustee election areas or the manner
of nomination or election of school trustees after:
(a) Holding a public hearing of which notice must be given as
provided in subsection 3; and
(b) Receiving, at the hearing or by resolution, the consent of the
board of trustees of the school district.
9. If the Superintendent of Public Instruction certifies to the
county clerk that the enrollment of pupils during the preceding
school year in a county school district was less than 1,000, or was
1,000 or more but less than 1,500 in a district in which the board of
trustees has adopted a resolution in accordance with NRS 386.120
specifying that the board will consist of five members, and the board
of trustees of the county school district is composed of seven elected
members based upon a previous enrollment of 1,000 or more, the
board of county commissioners shall alter the school trustee election
areas or change the number of trustees to be elected from the areas,
or the manner of their nomination and election, as may be necessary
to provide for reduction of the membership of the board of trustees
of the county school board from seven to five members, and only
five school trustees may thereafter be nominated and elected at the
forthcoming elections.
10. If the Superintendent of Public Instruction certifies to the
county clerk that the enrollment of pupils during the preceding
school year in a county school district was 1,000 or more, and the
board of trustees of the county school district is composed of five
elected members, the board of county commissioners shall alter the
school trustee election areas or change the number of trustees to be
elected from the areas, or the manner of their nomination and
election, as may be necessary to provide for increasing the
membership of the board of trustees of the county school district
from five to seven members, and two additional school trustees must
thereafter be nominated and elected at the forthcoming elections.
11. The provisions of subsection 10 do not apply in a school
district in which the pupil enrollment during the preceding school
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 39 –
year was 1,000 or more but less than 1,500, and in which the board
of trustees of the school district has adopted a resolution specifying
that the board will consist of five members.
Sec. 48. NRS 386.225 is hereby amended to read as follows:
386.225 1. Election districts created pursuant to NRS
386.205 may be constructed so that the:
(a) Voters in each election district elect a trustee to represent
them; or
(b) Trustees are elected by all of the voters in the county school
district.
 In either case, each trustee must be a resident of the election
district which he or she represents throughout his or her term of
office [.] and registered to vote in the election district.
2. The board of trustees shall adopt a resolution, after a public
hearing on the matter, determining whether each trustee will be
elected solely by the voters in the election district of the trustee or
all of the voters in the county school district.
Sec. 49. NRS 386.240 is hereby amended to read as follows:
386.240 A candidate for election to the office of trustee of a
school district shall:
1. Be a qualified elector.
2. Have the qualifications of residence within the county
school district required for the office for which he or she seeks
election.
3. Be registered to vote in the county school district required
for the office for which he or she seeks election.
Sec. 50. NRS 396.040 is hereby amended to read as follows:
396.040 1. The Board of Regents consists of 13 members
elected by the registered voters within the districts described in the
shapefile adopted by NRS 396.047.
2. The members of the Board of Regents must be elected as
follows:
(a) At the general election in 2002, and every 6 years thereafter,
one member of the Board of Regents must be elected from districts
2, 3, 5 and 10.
(b) At the general election in 2004, and every 6 years thereafter,
one member of the Board of Regents must be elected from districts
6, 7, 8, 11 and 13.
(c) At the general election in 2006, and every 6 years thereafter,
one member of the Board of Regents must be elected from districts
1, 4, 9 and 12.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 40 –
3. Each member of the Board of Regents must be a resident of
the district from which the member is elected [.] and registered to
vote in the district.
Sec. 51. NRS 450.070 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450.070 1. Except in counties where the board of county
commissioners is the board of hospital trustees, the board of hospital
trustees for the public hospital consists of five trustees, who must:
(a) Be residents of the county or counties concerned.
(b) Be registered to vote in the county or counties concerned.
(c) Be elected as provided in subsection 2.
2. In any county:
(a) Whose population is less than 100,000, hospital trustees
must be elected for terms of 4 years in the same manner as other
county officers are elected.
(b) Whose population is 100,000 or more but less than 700,000,
hospital trustees must be elected from the county at large for terms
of 4 years.
Sec. 52. NRS 474.070 is hereby amended to read as follows:
474.070 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
when, pursuant to the provisions of NRS 474.040, 474.050 and
474.060, the boundaries of the proposed district are defined and
established by the board, the board of county commissioners shall
make an order dividing the proposed district into three or five
divisions as nearly equal in size as practicable. The divisions must
be numbered consecutively and constitute election precincts for the
district.
2. When or after the boundaries of a district are established, the
board of county commissioners may provide for the election of three
or five directors at large, without precincts.
3. If precincts are created, each director must be [a] :
(a) A resident of the election precinct for which the director is
elected ;
(b) Registered to vote in the election precinct for which the
director is elected; and [must be elected]
(c) Elected at large by the district.
Sec. 53. NRS 474.145 is hereby amended to read as follows:
474.145 1. If a vacancy occurs on the board of directors of a
county fire protection district, the remaining directors shall fill the
vacancy by appointing a qualified elector who is registered to vote
in the district to serve during the rest of the term and until his or her
successor is elected and qualified.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 41 –
2. If the remaining directors fail or refuse to appoint a new
director within 30 days after the vacancy occurs, the board of county
commissioners shall appoint a person to fill the vacancy.
Sec. 54. NRS 539.045 is hereby amended to read as follows:
539.045 1. Upon making an order granting the prayer of the
petition as provided in NRS 539.043, the board of county
commissioners shall by further order entered upon its record submit
to the qualified electors of the proposed district at the next primary
or general election the question of whether that district shall be
organized pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, and by that
order shall submit the names of one or more persons from each of
the divisions of the district to be voted for as directors of the district.
2. One director must be elected from each division by the
qualified electors of the district and be a qualified elector of the
district and holder of title, or evidence of title as prescribed in NRS
539.020 and 539.023, to land within the division from which the
director is elected.
3. A candidate for election to the office of director must be
registered to vote in the district from which the director is elected.
Sec. 55. NRS 539.367 is hereby amended to read as follows:
539.367 1. One local director shall hold office until his or her
successor is elected at the next biennial district election and
qualifies, and the other local director shall hold office until his or
her successor is elected at the second biennial district election after
his or her appointment and qualifies.
2. The terms of such local directors shall be determined by lot,
and their successors shall be elected for 4-year terms at the biennial
elections.
3. The two local directors, with the director of the district from
the division, shall constitute the local board of such division.
4. The directors of the district shall fill any vacancy in the
office of local director of a division by the appointment of a
qualified elector from the division in which the vacancy occurs [.]
who is registered to vote in the division.
Sec. 56. NRS 548.225 is hereby amended to read as follows:
548.225 1. If the Commission determines that the operation
of the proposed district within the defined boundaries is
administratively practicable and feasible, the Commission shall
appoint five supervisors to act as the governing body of the district
until the time of the election of five supervisors by the qualified
electors of the district, at which time such appointments shall be
terminated. The number of supervisors elected to 2-year and 4-year
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 42 –
terms shall correspond to the respective numbers so elected in all
other districts at that particular election.
2. A candidate for the office of supervisor must be registered
to vote in the district from which the supervisor is elected.
3. The five supervisors appointed by the Commission shall be
persons who are by training and experience qualified to perform the
specialized, skilled services which will be required of them in the
performance of their duties hereunder.
Sec. 57. Section 5 of the Charter of Boulder City is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Section 5. Qualifications.
1. No person shall be eligible for the office of Council
Member or Mayor unless he or she is a qualified elector of
Boulder City , [and] has been a resident of the City for at least
2 years immediately prior to the election in which he or she is
a candidate [.] and is registered to vote in the City. He or she
shall hold no other elective public office, but he or she may
hold a commission as a notary public or be a member of the
Armed Forces reserve. No employee of the City or officer
thereof, excluding City Council Members, receiving
compensation under the provisions of this Charter or any City
ordinance, shall be a candidate for or eligible for the office of
Council Member or Mayor without first resigning from City
employment or City office. (Add. 8; Amd. 1; 6-7-1977; Add.
17; Amd. 1; 11-5-1996)
2. If a Council Member or the Mayor ceases to possess
any of the qualifications enumerated in subsection 1 or is
convicted of a felony, or ceases to be a resident of the City,
his or her office shall immediately become vacant. (1959
Charter) (Add. 17; Amd. 1; 11-5-1996)
Sec. 58. Section 2.010 of the Charter of the City of Caliente,
being chapter 31, Statutes of Nevada 1971, as last amended by
chapter 558, Statutes of Nevada 2019, at page 3549, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 2.010 City Council: Qualifications; election; term
of office; salary.
1. The legislative power of the City is vested in a City
Council consisting of five Council Members, including the
Mayor.
2. The Mayor and each Council Member must be:
(a) Bona fide residents of the City for at least 2 years
immediately prior to their election.
(b) Qualified electors within the City.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 43 –
(c) Registered to vote in the City.
3. All Council Members, including the Mayor, must be
voted upon by the registered voters of the City at large and
shall serve for terms of 4 years except as otherwise provided
in sections 5.010 and 5.120.
4. The Mayor and Council Members shall receive a
salary in an amount fixed by the City Council. Such salary
must not be increased or diminished during the term of the
recipient.
Sec. 59. Section 2.010 of the Charter of the City of Carlin,
being chapter 344, Statutes of Nevada 1971, as last amended by
chapter 58, Statutes of Nevada 2007, at page 142, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 2.010 Board of Council Members: Qualifications;
election; term of office; salary.
1. The legislative power of the City is vested in a Board
of Council Members consisting of four Council Members and
a Mayor.
2. The Mayor and Council Members must be:
(a) Bona fide residents of the City for at least 2 years
prior to their election.
(b) Qualified electors within the City.
(c) Registered to vote in the City.
3. All Council Members, including the Mayor, must be
voted upon by the registered voters of the City at large and,
except as otherwise provided in section 5.010, shall serve for
terms of 4 years.
4. The Mayor and Council Members first holding office
under this Charter shall each receive a monthly salary of $35
during the terms for which they were elected, selected or
appointed. Thereafter, subject to the provisions of subsection
5 of section 2.090, the Mayor and Council Members shall
receive a salary in an amount fixed by the Board of Council
Members.
Sec. 60. Section 2.010 of the Charter of Carson City, being
chapter 213, Statutes of Nevada 1969, as last amended by chapter
52, Statutes of Nevada 2023, at page 239, is hereby amended to read
as follows:
Sec. 2.010 Board of Supervisors: Qualifications;
election; term of office.
1. The legislative power of Carson City is vested in a
Board of Supervisors consisting of five Supervisors,
including the Mayor.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 44 –
2. The Mayor must be:
(a) An actual and bona fide resident of Carson City for at
least 6 months immediately preceding his or her election.
(b) A qualified elector within Carson City.
(c) Registered to vote in Carson City.
3. Each Supervisor must be:
(a) An actual and bona fide resident of Carson City for at
least 6 months immediately preceding his or her election.
(b) A qualified elector within the ward which he or she
represents.
(c) A resident of the ward which he or she represents,
except that changes effected in the boundaries of a ward
pursuant to the provisions of section 1.060 do not affect the
right of any elected Supervisor to continue in office for the
term for which he or she was elected.
(d) Registered to vote in the ward which he or she
represents.
4. All Supervisors, including the Mayor, must be voted
upon by the registered voters of Carson City at large and shall
serve for terms of 4 years. Each term of office:
(a) Begins at midnight on the first Monday in January
following the general election; and
(b) Ends at 11:59 p.m. on the day immediately preceding
the first Monday in January following the general election.
Sec. 61. Section 4.030 of the Charter of Carson City, being
chapter 213, Statutes of Nevada 1969, as last amended by chapter
96, Statutes of Nevada 1997, at page 182, is hereby amended to read
as follows:
Sec. 4.030 Municipal Court: Judges.
1. The justices of the peace of Carson City are ex officio
judges of the Municipal Court of Carson City which consists
of at least two departments.
2. The Board of Supervisors may by ordinance establish
a third department of the Municipal Court. The judge of this
department must be:
(a) A resident of Carson City for a continuous 6-month
period immediately preceding his or her election.
(b) A qualified elector.
(c) Registered to vote in Carson City.
3. If a third department of the Municipal Court is
established, the municipal judge elected for that department
serves for a term of 6 years.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 45 –
4. The Board may appoint a municipal judge for a part-
time or temporary position. The Board shall establish the
hours of service for this position.
5. The salary of the judges of the Municipal Court must
be fixed by the Board and be paid in the same manner as
provided for other elected officers.
Sec. 62. Section 2.010 of the Charter of the City of Elko,
being chapter 276, Statutes of Nevada 1971, as last amended by
chapter 231, Statutes of Nevada 2011, at page 1002, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 2.010 City Council: Qualifications; election; term
of office; salary.
1. The legislative power of the City is vested in a City
Council consisting of four members and the Mayor.
2. The members of the City Council must be:
(a) Bona fide residents of the City for at least 2 years
before their election.
(b) Qualified electors within the City.
(c) Registered to vote in the City.
3. All members of the City Council must be voted upon
by the registered voters of the City at large and, except as
otherwise provided in section 5.010, shall serve for terms of 4
years.
4. The members of the City Council must receive a
salary in an amount fixed by the City Council.
Sec. 63. Section 3.010 of the Charter of the City of Elko,
being chapter 276, Statutes of Nevada 1971, as last amended by
chapter 51, Statutes of Nevada 2001, at page 461, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 3.010 Mayor: Qualifications; duties; Mayor pro
tempore.
1. The Mayor must be:
(a) A bona fide resident of the City for at least 2 years
before his or her election.
(b) A qualified elector within the City.
(c) Registered to vote in the City.
2. The Mayor shall:
(a) Serve as ex officio President of the City Council and
preside over its meetings.
(b) Serve as the Chief Executive Officer of the City.
(c) Be recognized as the head of the City Government for
all ceremonial purposes.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 46 –
(d) Perform such emergency duties as may be necessary
for the health, welfare and safety of the City.
(e) Perform such other duties, except administrative
duties assigned by the City Council to the City Manager, as
may be prescribed by ordinance or by the provisions of
Nevada Revised Statutes which apply to a mayor of a city
organized under the provisions of a special charter.
3. The City Council shall elect one of its members to be
the Mayor pro tempore who:
(a) Holds such office and title, without additional
compensation, during the term for which he or she was
elected.
(b) Must perform the duties of Mayor during the absence
or disability of the Mayor.
(c) Must act as Mayor until the next municipal election if
the office of Mayor becomes vacant.
Sec. 64. Section 2.010 of the Charter of the City of Henderson,
being chapter 266, Statutes of Nevada 1971, as last amended by
chapter 558, Statutes of Nevada 2019, at page 3551, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 2.010 City Council: Qualifications; election; term
of office; salary.
1. The legislative power of the City is vested in a City
Council consisting of one Council Member from each ward
and the Mayor.
2. The Mayor must be:
(a) A bona fide resident of the territory which is
established by the boundaries of the City for the 12 months
immediately preceding the last day for filing a declaration of
candidacy for the office.
(b) A qualified elector within the City.
(c) Registered to vote in the City.
3. Each Council Member must be:
(a) A bona fide resident of the territory which is
established by the boundaries of the City for the 12 months
immediately preceding the last day for filing a declaration of
candidacy for the office.
(b) A qualified elector within the ward which he or she
represents.
(c) A resident of the ward which he or she represents for
at least 30 days immediately preceding the last day for filing
a declaration of candidacy for the office, except that
changes in ward boundaries pursuant to the provisions of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 47 –
section 1.040 do not affect the right of any elected Council
Member to continue in office for the term for which he or she
was elected.
(d) Registered to vote in the ward which he or she
represents.
4. All Council Members, including the Mayor, except as
otherwise provided in sections 5.020 and 5.120, shall serve
for terms of 4 years.
5. The Mayor and Council Members are entitled to
receive a salary in an amount fixed by the City Council. The
City Council shall not adopt an ordinance which increases or
decreases the salary of the Mayor or the Council Members
during the term for which they have been elected or
appointed.
Sec. 65. Section 2.020 of the Charter of the City of Las Vegas,
being chapter 517, Statutes of Nevada 1983, at page 1394, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 2.020 Mayor and Council Members:
Qualifications; terms of office; salary.
1. The Mayor must be [a] :
(a) A qualified elector who has resided within the
territory which is established by the boundaries of the City for
a period of not less than 30 days immediately before the last
day for filing a declaration of candidacy for that office ;
(b) Registered to vote in the City; and [be elected]
(c) Elected by the registered voters of the City at large.
2. Each Council Member must be [a] :
(a) A qualified elector who has resided within the ward
which he or she represents for a period of not less than 30
days immediately before the last day for filing a declaration
of candidacy for his or her office ;
(b) Registered to vote in the ward which he or she
represents; and [be elected]
(c) Elected by the registered voters of that ward.
3. The Mayor or any Council Member automatically
forfeits the remainder of his or her term of office and that
office becomes vacant if he or she ceases to be a resident of
the City or of the ward which he or she represents, as the case
may be.
4. The respective salaries of the Mayor and Council
Members must be fixed by ordinance.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 48 –
Sec. 66. Section 4.020 of the Charter of the City of Las Vegas,
being chapter 517, Statutes of Nevada 1983, as last amended by
chapter 558, Statutes of Nevada 2019, at page 3557, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 4.020 Municipal Court: Qualifications of
Municipal Judges; salary; Master Judge; departments;
Alternate Judges.
1. Each Municipal Judge shall devote his or her full time
to the duties of his or her office and must be:
(a) A duly licensed member, in good standing, of the
State Bar of Nevada, but this qualification does not apply to
any Municipal Judge who is an incumbent when this Charter
becomes effective as long as he or she continues to serve as
such in uninterrupted terms.
(b) A qualified elector who has resided within the
territory which is established by the boundaries of the City for
a period of not less than 30 days immediately before the last
day for filing a declaration of candidacy for the department
for which he or she is a candidate.
(c) Registered to vote in the City.
(d) Voted upon by the registered voters of the City at
large.
2. The salary of the Municipal Judges must be fixed by
ordinance and be uniform for all departments of the
Municipal Court. The salary may be increased during the
terms for which the Judges are elected or appointed.
3. The Municipal Judges of the six departments shall
elect a Master Judge from among their number. The Master
Judge shall hold office for a term of 2 years commencing on:
(a) If the general municipal election is held in an odd-
numbered year, July 1 of each year of a general municipal
election.
(b) If the general municipal election is held in an even-
numbered year, January 1 of the year following the general
municipal election.
4. If a vacancy occurs in the position of Master Judge,
the Municipal Judges shall elect a replacement for the
remainder of the unexpired term. If two or more Municipal
Judges receive an equal number of votes for the position of
Master Judge, the candidates who have received the tie votes
shall resolve the tie vote by the drawing of lots. The Master
Judge:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 49 –
(a) Shall establish and enforce administrative regulations
for governing the affairs of the Municipal Court.
(b) Is responsible for setting trial dates and other matters
which pertain to the Court calendar.
(c) Shall perform such other Court administrative duties
as may be required by the City Council.
5. Alternate Judges in sufficient numbers may be
appointed annually by the Mayor, each of whom:
(a) Must be a duly licensed member, in good standing, of
the State Bar of Nevada and have such other qualifications as
are prescribed by ordinance.
(b) Has all of the powers and jurisdiction of a Municipal
Judge while acting as such.
(c) Is entitled to such compensation as may be fixed by
the City Council.
6. Any Municipal Judge, other than an Alternate Judge,
automatically forfeits his or her office if he or she ceases to
be a resident of the City.
Sec. 67. Section 2.010 of the Charter of the City of Mesquite,
being chapter 325, Statutes of Nevada 2017, at page 1869, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 2.010 City Council: Qualifications; election; term
of office; salary.
1. The legislative power of the City is vested in a City
Council consisting of five Council members.
2. Each Council member must be elected at large and
without respect to the location of his or her residence, as long
as the residence is within the city limits of the City of
Mesquite.
3. Each Council member must be:
(a) A bona fide resident of the territory which is
established by the boundaries of the City for the 12 months
immediately preceding the last day for filing a declaration of
candidacy for the office.
(b) A qualified elector within the City.
(c) Registered to vote in the City.
4. All Council members must be voted upon by the
registered voters of the City at large and shall serve for terms
of 4 years.
5. The Council members are entitled to receive a salary
in an amount fixed by the City Council. The City Council
shall not adopt an ordinance which increases or decreases the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 50 –
salary of the Council members and becomes effective during
the term for which they have been elected or appointed.
Sec. 68. Section 3.010 of the Charter of the City of Mesquite,
being chapter 325, Statutes of Nevada 2017, at page 1880, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 3.010 Mayor: Qualifications; duties; election; term
of office; salary; Mayor pro tempore.
1. The Mayor must be:
(a) A bona fide resident of the territory which is
established by the boundaries of the City for the 12 months
immediately preceding the last day for filing a declaration of
candidacy for the office.
(b) A qualified elector within the City.
(c) Registered to vote in the City.
2. The Mayor:
(a) Shall preside over the meetings of the City Council,
but may not vote except in the case of breaking a tie vote.
While presiding over a meeting, the Mayor shall preserve
order and decorum among the members and enforce the rules
of the City Council and determine the order of business,
subject to those rules and appeal to the City Council, or as
provided by ordinance.
(b) Must be recognized as the official head of the City
Government for all ceremonial purposes and for the
performance of all duties lawfully delegated to the Mayor by
this Charter, by action of the City Council or by any law.
(c) Has the authority to declare emergencies as necessary
to protect the general health, welfare and safety of the City.
Any such declaration of emergency:
(1) May include a provision authorizing the Mayor to
act as the chief executive officer of all affairs of the City
during the emergency; and
(2) Must be reviewed by the City Council at its next
meeting.
(d) Shall provide an annual address to the City Council
during the first quarter of each year relating to the state of the
City, and recommend such measures as the Mayor may deem
beneficial to the City.
(e) Shall take all proper measures for the preservation of
public peace and order, and the suppression of riots, tumults
and all forms of public disturbances, for which purpose the
Mayor may, if the City is not participating in a metropolitan
police department, appoint extra police officers temporarily
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 51 –
and use and command the police force. If the City is
participating in a metropolitan police department, the Mayor
may request law enforcement assistance from the sheriff. In
either case, if local law enforcement forces are inadequate,
the Mayor shall call upon the Governor for military aid in the
manner provided by law.
(f) Shall sign all licenses and warrants and claims against
the City.
(g) May, subject to ratification by the City Council:
(1) Appoint himself or herself or any member of the
City Council to, or remove himself or herself or any member
of the City Council from, any board, commission or advisory
agency if the Mayor or Council member is granted a seat on
the board, commission or advisory agency because of his or
her elective office; or
(2) Appoint a person whom the City Council
determines to be qualified to fill the seat of any person
granted a seat pursuant to subparagraph (1) or remove such a
qualified person from that seat.
(h) Shall, with the advice and consent of the City Council,
appoint the City Manager and City Attorney.
(i) May propose ordinances, resolutions and
proclamations that the City Council shall consider.
(j) Shall perform such other duties as the City Council
prescribes by ordinance.
3. The Mayor may exercise the right of veto upon all
matters passed by the City Council, but has no power to
exercise a line-item veto. To pass any matter receiving the
Mayor’s veto requires a four-fifths vote of the City Council.
4. No resolution or contract requiring the payment of
money approved by the City Council or any ordinance may
go into force or have any effect until approved in writing by
the Mayor or his or her authorized designee, unless passed
over the Mayor’s veto. If the Mayor does not approve the
resolution, contract or ordinance so submitted, the Mayor
shall, within 5 days after the receipt thereof, return it to the
City Clerk with his or her reasons in writing for not
approving it. If the Mayor does not so return it, the resolution
or contract thereupon goes into effect and the ordinance
becomes a law, in like manner and with the same effect as if
it had been approved by the Mayor.
5. Any of the duties set forth in:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 52 –
(a) Subsection 2 or 4, other than the duties set forth in
paragraph (c) or (f) of subsection 2, may be delegated to the
Mayor pro tempore by the Mayor administratively or in
instances of abstention during an official meeting.
(b) Paragraph (c) or (f) of subsection 2 may be delegated
to the City Manager by the Mayor administratively.
6. The Mayor:
(a) Must be voted upon by the registered voters of the
City at large and shall serve for a term of 4 years.
(b) Is entitled to receive a salary in an amount fixed by
the City Council. The City Council shall not adopt an
ordinance which increases or decreases the salary of the
Mayor during the term for which he or she has been elected.
7. The City Council shall elect one of its members to be
Mayor pro tempore. Such person shall:
(a) Hold such office and title, without additional
compensation, during the term for which he or she was
elected.
(b) Perform the duties of Mayor during the absence or
disability of the Mayor.
(c) Act as Mayor until the City Council appoints a Mayor,
if the office of Mayor becomes vacant.
Sec. 69. Section 2.010 of the Charter of the City of North Las
Vegas, being chapter 573, Statutes of Nevada 1971, as last amended
by chapter 558, Statutes of Nevada 2019, at page 3561, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 2.010 City Council: Qualifications; election; term
of office; salary.
1. The legislative power of the City is vested in a City
Council consisting of four Council Members and a Mayor.
2. The Mayor must be:
(a) A bona fide resident of the City for at least 6 months
immediately preceding his or her election.
(b) A qualified elector within the City.
(c) Registered to vote in the City.
3. Each Council Member:
(a) Must be a qualified elector who has resided in the
ward which he or she represents for at least 30 days
immediately preceding the last day for filing a declaration of
candidacy for his or her office.
(b) Must continue to live in the ward he or she represents,
except that changes in ward boundaries made pursuant to
section 1.045 will not affect the right of any elected Council
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 53 –
Member to continue in office for the term for which he or she
was elected.
(c) Must be registered to vote in the ward which he or
she represents.
4. At the time of filing, if so required by an ordinance
duly enacted, candidates for the office of Mayor and Council
Member shall produce evidence in satisfaction of any or all of
the qualifications provided in subsection 2 or 3, whichever is
applicable.
5. Each Council Member must be voted upon only by
the registered voters of the ward that he or she seeks to
represent, and except as otherwise provided in sections 5.010
and 5.100, his or her term of office is 4 years.
6. The Mayor must be voted upon by the registered
voters of the City at large, and except as otherwise provided
in sections 5.010 and 5.100, his or her term of office is 4
years.
7. The Mayor and Council Members are entitled to
receive a salary in an amount fixed by the City Council.
Sec. 70. Section 2.010 of the Charter of the City of Reno,
being chapter 662, Statutes of Nevada 1971, as last amended by
chapter 584, Statutes of Nevada 2017, at page 4198, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 2.010 Mayor and City Council: Qualifications;
election; term of office; salary.
1. The legislative power of the City is vested in a City
Council consisting of six Council Members and a Mayor.
2. The Mayor and Council Members must be qualified
electors within the City [.] and registered to vote in the City
or ward which he or she represents, as applicable. Each
Council Member elected from a ward must continue to live in
that ward for as long as he or she represents the ward.
3. The Mayor represents the City at large and one
Council Member represents each ward. The Mayor and
Council Members serve for terms of 4 years.
4. The Mayor and Council Members are entitled to
receive a salary in an amount fixed by the City Council.
Sec. 71. Section 3.060 of the Charter of the City of Reno,
being chapter 662, Statutes of Nevada 1971, as last amended by
chapter 163, Statutes of Nevada 2015, at page 772, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 54 –
Sec. 3.060 City Attorney: Qualifications; duties; salary.
1. The City Attorney must be a duly licensed member of
the State Bar of Nevada , [and] a qualified elector within the
City [.] and registered to vote in the City. Once elected, he or
she shall hold office for a term of 4 years and until his or her
successor is duly elected and qualified.
2. The City Attorney is the Legal Officer of the City and
shall:
(a) Perform such duties as are designated by ordinance;
(b) Be present at all meetings of the City Council;
(c) Be counsel for the Commission;
(d) Devote his or her full time to the duties of the office;
and
(e) Not engage in the private practice of law.
3. The City Attorney is entitled to receive a salary as
fixed by resolution of the City Council.
4. As he or she requires in the discharge of the duties of
his or her office, the City Attorney may:
(a) Appoint and remove any professional and
paraprofessional legal staff, including, without limitation,
attorneys, paralegals, investigators, an office administrator
and an executive assistant. Professional and paraprofessional
legal staff must not be Civil Service employees.
(b) Appoint and remove clerical staff, including, without
limitation, management assistants, legal secretaries and
advocates. Clerical staff must not be Civil Service employees.
5. The Council may appropriate such an amount of
money as it deems proper to compensate the professional and
paraprofessional legal staff and clerical staff appointed by the
City Attorney pursuant to subsection 4.
6. Any attorney or paralegal who is employed for more
than 20 hours per week by the City Attorney shall not engage
in the private practice of law.
Sec. 72. Section 4.020 of the Charter of the City of Reno,
being chapter 662, Statutes of Nevada 1971, as last amended by
chapter 349, Statutes of Nevada 2013, at page 1828, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 4.020 Municipal Court: Qualifications of
Municipal Judge; salary.
1. A Municipal Judge must be:
(a) An attorney licensed to practice law in the State.
(b) A qualified elector within the City.
(c) Registered to vote in the City.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 55 –
2. A Municipal Judge shall not engage in the private
practice of law.
3. The salary of a Municipal Judge must be:
(a) Fixed by resolution of the City Council.
(b) Uniform for all judges in the Municipal Court.
Sec. 73. Section 2.010 of the Charter of the City of Wells,
being chapter 275, Statutes of Nevada 1971, as last amended by
chapter 59, Statutes of Nevada 2007, at page 144, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 2.010 Board of Council Members: Qualifications;
election; term of office; salary.
1. The legislative power of the City is vested in a Board
of Council Members consisting of four Council Members and
a Mayor.
2. The Mayor and Council Members must be:
(a) Bona fide residents of the City for at least 2 years
prior to their election.
(b) Qualified electors within the City.
(c) Registered to vote in the City.
3. All Council Members, including the Mayor, must be
voted upon by the registered voters of the City at large and,
except as otherwise provided in section 5.010, shall serve for
terms of 4 years.
4. The Mayor and Council Members shall receive a
salary in an amount fixed by the Board of Council Members.
Sec. 74. Section 2.010 of the Charter of the City of Yerington,
being chapter 465, Statutes of Nevada 1971, as last amended by
chapter 558, Statutes of Nevada 2019, at page 3564, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 2.010 City Council: Qualifications; election; term
of office; salary.
1. The legislative power of the City is vested in a City
Council consisting of four Council Members.
2. The Council Members must be:
(a) Bona fide residents of the City for at least 6 months
immediately preceding their election.
(b) Qualified electors in the City.
(c) Registered to vote in the City.
3. All Council Members must be voted upon by the
registered voters of the City at large and, except as otherwise
provided in sections 5.010 and 5.110, shall serve for terms of
4 years.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 56 –
4. The Council Members shall receive a salary in an
amount fixed by the City Council.
Sec. 75. Section 3.010 of the Charter of the City of Yerington,
being chapter 465, Statutes of Nevada 1971, as last amended by
chapter 98, Statutes of Nevada 1977, at page 213, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 3.010 Mayor: Qualifications; duties.
1. The Mayor shall be:
(a) A bona fide resident of the City for at least 6 months
immediately preceding his or her election.
(b) A qualified elector in the City.
(c) Registered to vote in the City.
2. The Mayor shall:
(a) Serve as the Chief Executive and Administrative
Officer of the City.
(b) Preside over the meetings of the City Council. He or
she shall not be entitled to vote on any matter before the
Council except in case of a tie.
(c) Have the right of veto on any matter passed by the
City Council. A three-fourths vote of the Council is necessary
to override such veto.
(d) Perform such emergency duties as may be necessary
for the general health, welfare and safety of the City.
(e) Perform such other duties as may be prescribed by
ordinance or by the provisions of Nevada Revised Statutes
which apply to a mayor of a city organized under the
provisions of a special charter.
Sec. 76. Section 6 of the Moapa Valley Water District Act,
being chapter 477, Statutes of Nevada 1983, as last amended by
chapter 218, Statutes of Nevada 2001, at page 991 is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 6. 1. Each member of the Board must:
(a) Actually, as opposed to constructively, reside in the
election area represented for at least 30 days immediately
preceding the date of the close of filing of declarations of
candidacy as set forth in section 7 of this chapter;
(b) Be a qualified elector of the election area represented;
(c) Be registered to vote in the election area represented;
and
[(c)] (d) Take office upon qualification therefor as
provided in subsection 2, or on the first Monday in January
next following the member’s election, whichever is later, and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 57 –
leave office upon the first Monday in January next following
the election of the member’s successor in office.
2. Before taking office, each member of the Board must
qualify by filing with the Clerk of Clark County:
(a) An oath of office taken and subscribed in the manner
prescribed by the Clerk; and
(b) A corporate surety bond, at the expense of the District,
in an amount determined by the Clerk, but no greater than
$10,000, which bond must guarantee the faithful performance
of the duties of the member.
3. A vacancy on the Board must be filled by an
appointment made by the remaining members of the Board.
The person so appointed must be, for the 30 days
immediately preceding the date of appointment, a resident
and elector of the election area represented, and, before taking
office, qualify in the manner prescribed in subsection 2. The
person shall serve until the first Monday in January following
the next general district election. If that general district
election precedes the expiration of the term of the member
whose absence required the appointment, the balance of that
term must be filled at that general district election in the same
manner as prescribed for the election of other members of the
Board. If the Board fails, neglects or refuses to fill a vacancy
within 30 days after a vacancy occurs, the Board of County
Commissioners of Clark County shall fill the vacancy.
Sec. 77. Section 7 of the Virgin Valley Water District Act,
being chapter 100, Statutes of Nevada 1993, as amended by chapter
353, Statutes of Nevada 2013, at page 1849 is hereby amended to
read as follows:
Sec. 7. 1. Each member of the Board must:
(a) Reside in the geographical area represented, or if the
Board has established various election areas, the election area
represented, for at least 6 months before the election at which
the member is elected;
(b) Be a qualified elector of the geographical area
represented or the election area represented;
(c) Be registered to vote in the geographical area
represented or the election area represented; and
[(c)] (d) Take office upon qualification therefor as
provided in subsection 2, or on the first Monday in January
next following the member’s election, whichever is later, and
leave office upon the first Monday in January next following
the election of the member’s successor in office.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 58 –
2. Before taking office, each member of the Board must
qualify by filing with the Clerk of Clark County:
(a) An oath of office taken and subscribed in the manner
prescribed by the Clerk; and
(b) A corporate surety bond, at the expense of the District,
in an amount determined by the Clerk, but no greater than
$10,000, which bond must guarantee the faithful performance
of the duties of the member.
3. A vacancy in the office of a member of the Board
must be filled by appointment of the remaining members of
the Board. The person so appointed must be a resident and
elector of the geographical area represented, or if the Board
has established various election areas, the election area
represented, and, before taking office, qualify in the manner
prescribed in subsection 2. The person shall serve the
remainder of the term of the member whose absence required
his or her appointment. If the Board fails, neglects or refuses
to fill a vacancy within 30 days after a vacancy occurs, the
Board of County Commissioners of Clark County shall fill
the vacancy.
Sec. 78. 1. The amendatory provisions of this act do not
apply to a person who, on October 1, 2025, holds an elected office
in this State.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1, the
amendatory provisions of this act apply to every person who, after
October 1, 2025, files a declaration of candidacy for any elected
office in this State other than federal office.
Sec. 79. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)